New Mexico, session 2025S1, HB1.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF NEW MEXICO:
SECTION 1. SPECIAL SESSION--APPROPRIATIONS.--
A. The following amounts are appropriated from
legislative cash balances for expenditure in fiscal year 2026
for the following expenses of the first special session of
the fifty-seventh legislature. Any unexpended balance
remaining at the end of fiscal year 2026 shall revert to HB 1
Page 1

legislative cash balances:
(1) for the expense of the house of
representatives, one hundred five thousand dollars ($105,000)
to be disbursed on vouchers signed by the speaker and the
chief clerk of the house of representatives or the chief
clerk's designee;
(2) for the expense of the senate, seventy
thousand dollars ($70,000) to be disbursed on vouchers signed
by the chair of the committees' committee and the chief clerk
of the senate or the chief clerk's designee; and
(3) for the expense of the legislative
council service, sixty-five thousand dollars ($65,000) to be
disbursed on vouchers signed by the director of the
legislative council service or the director's designee.
B. Following adjournment of the first special
session of the fifty-seventh legislature, expenditures
authorized in this section shall be disbursed on vouchers
signed by the director of the legislative council service or
the director's designee.
SECTION 2. APPROPRIATION--ADMINISTRATIVE OFFICE OF THE
COURTS.--One million dollars ($1,000,000) is appropriated
from the general fund to the administrative office of the
courts for expenditure in fiscal years 2026 and 2027 for the
expansion of assisted outpatient treatment programs,
competency diversion pilot programs and other behavioral HB 1
Page 2

health pilot programs. Any unexpended balance remaining at
the end of fiscal year 2027 shall revert to the general fund.
SECTION 3. APPROPRIATIONS--EDUCATIONAL TELEVISION AND
PUBLIC RADIO.--
A. Five million five hundred sixty thousand nine
hundred sixty-two dollars ($5,560,962) is appropriated from
the general fund to the department of finance and
administration for expenditure in fiscal years 2026 and 2027
for educational television and public radio. Any unexpended
balance remaining at the end of fiscal year 2027 shall revert
to the general fund.
B. Four hundred twenty-nine thousand five hundred
twenty-seven dollars ($429,527) is appropriated from the
general fund to the Indian affairs department for expenditure
in fiscal years 2026 and 2027 for educational television and
public radio provided by and for Indian nations, tribes and
pueblos. Any unexpended balance remaining at the end of
fiscal year 2027 shall revert to the general fund.
SECTION 4. APPROPRIATIONS--HEALTH CARE AUTHORITY.--
A. The following amounts are appropriated from the
general fund to the health care authority for expenditure in
fiscal years 2026 and 2027. Any unexpended balance remaining
at the end of fiscal year 2027 shall revert to the general
fund:
(1) four million six hundred thousand HB 1
Page 3

dollars ($4,600,000) to maintain the minimum federal
supplemental nutrition assistance program benefit for elders
and people with disabilities;
(2) twelve million dollars ($12,000,000) to
maintain the minimum federal supplemental nutrition
assistance program benefit for lawfully present residents;
(3) one million two hundred forty-six
thousand dollars ($1,246,000) to prevent layoffs of employees
administering the federal supplemental nutrition assistance
program nutrition education and obesity prevention grant
program at the university of New Mexico and New Mexico state
university;
(4) eight million dollars ($8,000,000) to
support food banks, food pantries, regional distribution
organizations and partner agencies in the state to ensure
access to nutritious food, including two million five hundred
thousand dollars ($2,500,000) for capacity building,
transportation, logistics and operational expenses;
(5) two million dollars ($2,000,000) to
support educational-based centers and food pantry and food
distribution programs in consultation with the early
childhood education and care department, the public education
department and the higher education department;
(6) one million five hundred thousand
dollars ($1,500,000) to, in consultation with the workforce HB 1
Page 4

solutions department, support individuals in meeting work and
volunteer requirements necessary to qualify for benefits
under the federal supplemental nutrition assistance program
and the state medicaid program;
(7) four million four hundred thousand
dollars ($4,400,000) for additional staffing and
administrative costs for the income support division of the
authority;
(8) two million two hundred thousand dollars
($2,200,000) for services, additional staffing and
administrative costs for the medical assistance division of
the authority; and
(9) ten million dollars ($10,000,000) for
updates to information technology and other costs related to
changes to eligibility requirements for medicaid and the
federal supplemental nutrition assistance program made by
Public Law No. 119–21.
B. Three million dollars ($3,000,000) is
appropriated from the general fund to the health care
authority for expenditure in fiscal year 2026 to contract for
health care services provided by nonprofit health care
facilities not eligible under federal law to receive medicaid
funding. Any unexpended balance remaining at the end of
fiscal year 2026 shall revert to the general fund.
C. Seventeen million three hundred thousand HB 1
Page 5

dollars ($17,300,000) is appropriated from the health care
affordability fund to the health care authority for
expenditure in fiscal year 2026 to reduce health care
premiums and cost sharing for New Mexico residents who
purchase health care coverage on the New Mexico health
insurance exchange contingent on enactment of House Bill 2 or
similar legislation of the first special session of the
fifty-seventh legislature. Any unexpended balance remaining
at the end of fiscal year 2026 shall revert to the health
care affordability fund.
SECTION 5. APPROPRIATIONS--REGULATION AND LICENSING
DEPARTMENT.--The following amounts are appropriated from the
general fund to the regulation and licensing department for
expenditure in fiscal year 2026. Any unexpended balance
remaining at the end of fiscal year 2026 shall revert to the
general fund:
A. seven million eight hundred seventy-nine
thousand six hundred six dollars ($7,879,606) for projected
shortfalls in operating expenses and to remediate cash
deficits; and
B. one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) to
implement interstate compacts regarding health care
professionals.
SECTION 6. APPROPRIATION--NEW MEXICO STATE
UNIVERSITY.--Four hundred fifty thousand dollars ($450,000) HB 1
Page 6

is appropriated from the general fund to the board of regents
of New Mexico state university for expenditure in fiscal year
2026 for the university's college assistance program to
provide post-secondary educational needs of United States
citizens and permanent legal residents who worked as
migratory seasonal farmworkers, dairy workers and ranch
workers. Any unexpended balance remaining at the end of
fiscal year 2026 shall revert to the general fund.
SECTION 7. TRANSFERS.--
A. Thirty million dollars ($30,000,000) is
transferred from the general fund to the appropriation
contingency fund.
B. Fifty million dollars ($50,000,000) is
transferred from the general fund to the rural health care
delivery fund.
SECTION 8. REVERSION OF BALANCES FROM LAWS 2023 GENERAL
FUND APPROPRIATION TO THE HUMAN SERVICES DEPARTMENT.--On the
effective date of this act, one hundred twenty million dollars
($120,000,000) of the unexpended balance of the appropriation
to the human services department for the medical assistance
program in the other category as provided in Laws 2023,
Chapter 210, Section 4 shall revert to the general fund
operating reserve, and within thirty days of the effective
date of this act, the department of finance and administration
shall transfer such unexpended balance to the general fund HB 1
Page 7

operating reserve. HB 1
Page 8